Arkansas, session 2025, SB105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor 1 $208,138
(2) IT Pool 3
Network Engineer $200,973
*HAR025*
01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025

SB105
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025

SB105
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(3) Provost 1 $167,057
(4) Vice Chan. for Finance & Administration 1 $156,658
(5) Vice Chancellor for Student Affairs 1 $156,658
(6) Director of Human Resources 1 $132,733
(7) Director of Workforce Development 1 $129,825
(8) Registrar 1 $122,249
(9) Director of Financial Aid 1 $122,005
(10) Director Planning & Assessment 1 $120,919
(11) Project/Program Administrator Pool 10
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,256
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
(12) Director of Computer Services 1 $119,967
(13) Controller 1 $117,181
(14) Director of Development 1 $113,455
(15) Director of Physical Plant 1 $113,103
(16) Director of Admissions 1 $111,453
(17) Director of Special Programs 1 $111,361
01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025

SB105
(18) Coordinator of Career Services 1 $104,457
(19) Director of Academic Advising 1 $104,457
(20) Director of Institutional Research 1 $101,348
(21) Fiscal Support Pool 4
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(22) Public Safety Pool 2
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(23) Academic Advisor 4 $77,184
(24) Skilled Trades Pool 5
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(25) Assistant Director of Financial Aid 1 $72,774
(26) HEI Program Coordinator 1 $69,975
01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025

SB105
(27) Administrative Support Pool 15
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(28) Bookstore Manager 1 $67,284
(29) Library Support Pool 1
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(30) Purchasing Specialist 1 $67,284
(31) Financial Aid Specialist 1 $62,208
(32) Human Resources Specialist 1 $62,208
(33) Records Management Analyst 1 $62,208
(34) Admissions Specialist 2 $51,130
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(35) Division Chairperson 5 $146,201
(36) Faculty 20 $139,340
(37) Librarian 1 $132,733
(38) Director of Adult Education 1 $127,510
(39) Instructor - Nursing & Allied Health 12 $120,305
(40) Special Instructor/Trainer 4 $84,321
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(41) Faculty 25 $111,362
(42) Part-Time Faculty 100 $56,046
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(43) Food Service Pool 2
01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025

SB105
Food Preparation Manager $64,696
Food Preparation Supervisor $57,515
Food Preparation Coordinator $51,130
Food Preparation Specialist $43,706
Food Preparation Technician $40,409
(44) Cashier 1 $51,130
(45) Cook 1 $43,706
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 243

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: one hundred (100) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville,
to be payable from the University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the University of
Arkansas Community College at Batesville for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,185,225
(02) EXTRA HELP 245,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 750,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 5,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025

SB105
(05) CONTINGENCY 259,261
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,444,486

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville, to be payable
from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services
and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas Community College at
Batesville for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,955,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 285,000
(03) OVERTIME 1,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,800,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,700,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 185,000
(C) PROF. FEES 300,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 4,500,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 1,000,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 900,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,126,000

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025

SB105
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.














01/27/2025 10:07:39 AM HAR025